Nebraska, session 109, LB1079.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1079 LB1079
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 29-2221, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
29-2221 (1) Whoever has been twice convicted of a crime, sentenced,
and committed to prison, in this or any other state or by the United
States or once in this state and once at least in any other state or by
the United States, for terms of not less than one year each shall, upon
conviction of a felony committed in this state, be deemed to be a
habitual criminal and shall be punished by imprisonment in a Department
of Correctional Services adult correctional facility for a mandatory
minimum term of ten years and a maximum term of not more than sixty
years, except that:
(a) If the felony committed is in violation of section 28-303,
28-304, 28-308, 28-313, 28-319, 28-319.01, 28-502, 28-929, or 28-1222,
and at least one of the habitual criminal's prior felony convictions was
for a violation of one of the sections listed in this subdivision or of a
similar statute in another state or of the United States, the mandatory
minimum term shall be twenty-five years and the maximum term not more
than sixty years;
(b) If the felony committed is in violation of subsection (3) of
section 28-306 and at least one of the prior convictions is in violation
of subsection (3) of section 28-306 and the other is in violation of one
of the sections set forth in subdivision (a) of this subsection or if the
felony committed is in violation of one of the sections set forth in
subdivision (a) of this subsection and both of the prior convictions are
in violation of subsection (3) of section 28-306, the mandatory minimum
term shall be twenty-five years and the maximum term not more than sixty
years;
(c) If the felony committed is in violation of subsection (3) of
section 28-416 or in violation of sections 28-509 to 28-518 and all of
the habitual criminal's prior felony convictions are also violations of
such subsection or sections or of a similar statute in another state or
-2-

LB1079 LB1079
2026 2026
of the United States, the mandatory minimum term shall be three years and
the maximum term not more than twenty years; and
(d) If the felony committed is in violation of sections 28-509 to
28-518 and two or more of the habitual criminal's prior felony
convictions are also violations of such sections or of similar statutes
in another state or of the United States, the mandatory minimum shall be
three years and the maximum term not more than twenty years. The
enhancement provided for in this subdivision (1)(d) shall apply even if
one or more of such prior convictions did not result in any term of
imprisonment; and
(e) (d) If a greater punishment is otherwise provided by statute,
the law creating the greater punishment shall govern.
(2) When punishment of an accused as a habitual criminal is sought,
the facts with reference thereto shall be charged in the indictment or
information which contains the charge of the felony upon which the
accused is prosecuted, but the fact that the accused is charged with
being a habitual criminal shall not be an issue upon the trial of the
felony charge and shall not in any manner be disclosed to the jury. If
the accused is convicted of a felony, before sentence is imposed a
hearing shall be had before the court alone as to whether such person has
been previously convicted of prior felonies. The court shall fix a time
for the hearing and notice thereof shall be given to the accused at least
three days prior thereto. At the hearing, if the court finds from the
evidence submitted that the accused has been convicted two or more times
of felonies and sentences imposed therefor by the courts of this or any
other state or by the United States, the court shall sentence such person
so convicted as a habitual criminal.
(3) If the person so convicted shows to the satisfaction of the
court before which the conviction was had that he or she was released
from imprisonment upon either of such sentences upon a pardon granted for
the reason that he or she was innocent, such conviction and sentence
-3-

LB1079 LB1079
2026 2026
shall not be considered as such under this section and section 29-2222.
Sec. 2. Original section 29-2221, Revised Statutes Supplement,
2025, is repealed.
-4-